Florida, session 2026, HB1379.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) OUTSIDER LICENSE PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop an Outsider license plate
as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The plate must
bear the colors and design approved by the department. The word
"Florida" must appear at the top of the plate, and the word
"Outsider" must appear at the bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate shall
be distributed to the Hoober Brothers Foundation, Inc., a
nonprofit corporation under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code. The foundation may use up to 25 percent of the proceeds to
promote and market the plate and to cover administrative costs.
The remaining 75 percent of the proceeds shall be used by the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1379-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1379 2026
Hoober Brothers Foundation, Inc., to create and restore iconic
public destinations in this state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1379-00